Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB578.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1731(a) of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 1731. Availability, scope and amount of coverage.(a) Mandatory offering.--No motor vehicle liability insurance policy shall be delivered or issued for delivery in this Commonwealth, with respect to any motor vehicle registered or principally garaged in this Commonwealth, unless uninsured motorist and underinsured motorist coverages are offered therein 1234567891011121314151617181920212223 or supplemental thereto in amounts as provided in section [1734 (relating to request for lower limits of coverage). Purchase] 1734.1 (relating to offer of lower limits of coverage). The election of uninsured motorist and underinsured motorist coverages is optional.* * * Section 2. Section 1734 of Title 75 is repealed:[§ 1734. Request for lower limits of coverage.A named insured may request in writing the issuance of coverages under section 1731 (relating to availability, scope and amount of coverage) in amounts equal to or less than the limits of liability for bodily injury.]Section 3. Title 75 is amended by adding a section to read:§ 1734.1. Offer of lower limits of coverage.(a) Stacking prohibited.--An insurer may not stack uninsured and underinsured motorist coverage in a motor vehicle liability insurance policy delivered or issued for delivery in this Commonwealth to determine the limit of the coverage available to an insured for injuries sustained in an accident.(b) New policies.--(1) On an initial application, an insurer that issues to a named insured a motor vehicle liability insurance policy delivered or issued for delivery in this Commonwealth shall offer uninsured and underinsured motorist coverage in an amount equal to the bodily injury liability limits elected. An insurer shall make available and a named insured may select amounts of uninsured and underinsured motorist coverage lower than the bodily injury liability limits elected. An insurer may make available amounts of uninsured and underinsured motorist coverage higher than the bodily 20250SB0578PN0586 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 injury liability limits elected.(2) On an initial application, a named insured shall be conclusively presumed to have elected uninsured and underinsured motorist coverage equivalent to that elected by a named insured for bodily injury unless the uninsured and underinsured motorist coverage was rejected on the policy in accordance with section 1731 (relating to availability, scope and amount of coverage) or elected in a different amount by a named insured.(c) Renewed policies.--(1) Unless another amount is selected in writing by a named insured or otherwise provided in accordance with this chapter, for a policy renewing on or after one year from the effective date of this paragraph an insurer shall renew the policy to include equivalent amounts of uninsured and underinsured motorist coverage, if any, as elected by the named insured in the policy being superseded . (2) Subje ct to paragraph (1), a rejection or reduction of uninsured or underinsured benefits on a policy by a named insured before the effective date of this paragraph shall remain valid.(3) For the purposes of paragraph (1), equivalent amounts of uninsured and underinsured motorist coverage shall not include coverage limits under more than one policy.(d) Elections.--An election made or deemed to be made on initial application or at a renewal shall remain in effect throughout the lifetime of the policy until affirmatively changed by the named insured.( e) Notice of coverage.-- (1) No later than the initial issuance or initial 20250SB0578PN0586 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 renewal of a motor vehicle liability insurance policy, in the first year 180 days after the effective date of this paragraph, an insurer shall provide in writing to the named insured under the policy the following notice with respect to the election of uninsured and underinsured motorist coverage:Uninsured and underinsured motorist coverage is available to provide compensation for injuries caused by persons who either have no automobile insurance or do not have enough automobile insurance to compensate you and your family for your injuries. This coverage is important to provide protection for you. Previously, you were able to purchase stacking of uninsured and underinsured motorist coverage. Stacking increases your uninsured and underinsured motorist coverage by adding the limits of this coverage for each vehicle for which the injured person is an insured.While stacking has been eliminated by law, you still have the right to elect uninsured and underinsured motorist coverage for motor vehicle liability insurance policies delivered or issued for delivery in this Commonwealth as a named insured in an amount equal to the amount of your bodily injury liability coverage limits. Insurers may, but are not required to, make available amounts of uninsured and underinsured motorist coverage higher than the bodily injury liability limits elected.You also retain the right to elect uninsured and underinsured motorist coverage less than the amount of your liability coverage or to reject such 20250SB0578PN0586 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 coverage.Your insurer shall renew all policies delivered or issued for delivery in this Commonwealth to include equivalent amounts of uninsured and underinsured motorist coverage, if any, as elected under the policy being superseded unless you respond to this notice and affirmatively elect a different amount of uninsured and underinsured motorist coverage to be issued at your next renewal.(2) An insurer shall certify to the Insurance Department that the insurer has complied with the notice requirement under paragraph (1). An insurer's failure to certify compliance with the notice requirement shall be subject to the commissioner's review and enforcement under the act of July 22, 1974 (P.L.589, No.205), known as the Unfair Insurance Practices Act.Section 4. Sections 1736 and 1738 of Title 75 are repealed:[§ 1736. Coverages in excess of required amounts.The coverages provided under this subchapter may be offered by insurers in amounts higher than those required by this chapter but may not be greater than the limits of liability specified in the bodily injury liability provisions of the insured's policy.§ 1738. Stacking of uninsured and underinsured benefits and option to waive.(a) Limit for each vehicle.--When more than one vehicle is insured under one or more policies providing uninsured or underinsured motorist coverage, the stated limit for uninsured or underinsured coverage shall apply separately to each vehicle so insured. The limits of coverages available under this 20250SB0578PN0586 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 subchapter for an insured shall be the sum of the limits for each motor vehicle as to which the injured person is an insured.(b) Waiver.--Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a), a named insured may waive coverage providing stacking of uninsured or underinsured coverages in which case the limits of coverage available under the policy for an insured shall be the stated limits for the motor vehicle as to which the injured person is an insured.(c) More than one vehicle.--Each named insured purchasing uninsured or underinsured motorist coverage for more than one vehicle under a policy shall be provided the opportunity to waive the stacked limits of coverage and instead purchase coverage as described in subsection (b). The premiums for an insured who exercises such waiver shall be reduced to reflect the different cost of such coverage.(d) Forms.--(1) The named insured shall be informed that he may exercise the waiver of the stacked limits of uninsured motorist coverage by signing the following written rejection form:UNINSURED COVERAGE LIMITSBy signing this waiver, I am rejecting stacked limits of uninsured motorist coverage under the policy for myself and members of my household under which the limits of coverage available would be the sum of limits for each motor vehicle insured under the policy. Instead, the limits of coverage that I am purchasing shall be reduced to the limits stated in the policy. I knowingly and voluntarily reject the stacked limits of coverage. I understand that my premiums will be reduced if I reject 20250SB0578PN0586 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 this coverage...............................................................Signature of First Named Insured..............................................................Date(2) The named insured shall be informed that he may exercise the waiver of the stacked limits of underinsured motorist coverage by signing the following written rejection form:UNDERINSURED COVERAGE LIMITSBy signing this waiver, I am rejecting stacked limits of underinsured motorist coverage under the policy for myself and members of my household under which the limits of coverage available would be the sum of limits for each motor vehicle insured under the policy. Instead, the limits of coverage that I am purchasing shall be reduced to the limits stated in the policy. I knowingly and voluntarily reject the stacked limits of coverage. I understand that my premiums will be reduced if I reject this coverage...............................................................Signature of First Named Insured..............................................................Date(e) Signature and date.--The forms described in subsection (d) must be signed by the first named insured and dated to be valid. Any rejection form that does not comply with this section is void.]Section 5. Title 75 is amended by adding a section to read:§ 1738.1. Stacking of uninsured and underinsured benefits 20250SB0578PN0586 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 prohibited.(a) Prohibition.--The limit of liability for uninsured and underinsured motorist coverage applicable to two or more motor vehicles covered under one or more policies delivered or issued for delivery in this Commonwealth shall not be added together to determine the limit of the coverage available to an insured for injuries sustained in an accident.(b) Insureds in noncovered vehicles.--If an insured is injured as an occupant of a motor vehicle not covered by the policy under which the person is a named insured or, if residing in the household of the named insured, a spouse or other relative of the named insured, the insured may recover the following, unless the coverage is otherwise excluded: (1) Benefits in accordance with section 1733(a)(1) (relating to priority of recovery). For the purposes of this subsection, the maximum recovery of uninsured or underinsured motorist coverage available from a policy under section 1733(a)(1) shall be the lesser of the policy's bodily injury or uninsured or underinsured motorist coverage limit. Recovery shall not be available under this paragraph from a policy under section 1733(a)(1) unless that policy maintains uninsured and underinsured motorist coverage.(2) Benefits in accordance with section 1733(a)(2) if the maximum total recovery under all policies providing benefits in accordance with section 1733(a)(2) is the single- highest limit under any one policy for which the person is an insured.(c) Insureds in covered vehicles.--If an insured is injured as an occupant of a motor vehicle covered by the policy under which the person is a named insured or, if residing in the 20250SB0578PN0586 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 household of the named insured, a spouse or other relative of the named insured, unless the coverage is otherwise excluded, the insured may recover only the uninsured or underinsured motorist coverage afforded by the policy covering the vehicle occupied by the insured at the time of the accident.(d) Pedestrians.--If an insured is injured as a pedestrian, the maximum total recovery under all policies providing benefits in accordance with section 1733(a)(2) shall be the single-highest limit under any one policy for which the person is an insured.Section 6. Sections 1791 and 1792 heading and (a) of Title 75 are amended to read:§ 1791. Notice of available benefits and limits.[It] Except as otherwise provided by the laws of this Commonwealth, it shall be presumed that the insured has been advised of the benefits and limits available under this chapter provided the following notice in bold print of at least ten-point type is given to the applicant at the time of application for original coverage, and no other notice, offer or rejection shall be required:IMPORTANT NOTICEInsurance companies operating in the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania are required by law to make available for purchase the following benefits for you, your spouse or other relatives or minors in your custody or in the custody of your relatives, residing in your household, occupants of your motor vehicle or persons struck by your motor vehicle:(1) Medical benefits, up to at least $100,000.(1.1) Extraordinary medical benefits, from $100,000 20250SB0578PN0586 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 to $1,100,000 which may be offered in increments of $100,000.(2) Income loss benefits, up to at least $2,500 per month up to a maximum benefit of at least $50,000.(3) Accidental death benefits, up to at least $25,000.(4) Funeral benefits, $2,500.(5) As an alternative to paragraphs (1), (2), (3) and (4), a combination benefit, up to at least $177,500 of benefits in the aggregate or benefits payable up to three years from the date of the accident, whichever occurs first, subject to a limit on accidental death benefit of up to $25,000 and a limit on funeral benefit of $2,500, provided that nothing contained in this subsection shall be construed to limit, reduce, modify or change the provisions of section 1715(d) (relating to availability of adequate limits).(6) [Uninsured, underinsured and bodily] Bodily injury liability coverage up to at least $100,000 because of injury to one person in any one accident and up to at least $300,000 because of injury to two or more persons in any one accident or, at the option of the insurer, up to at least $300,000 in a single limit for these coverages, except for policies issued under the Assigned Risk Plan. Also, at least $5,000 for damage to property of others in any one accident.[Additionally, insurers] (7) Uninsured and underinsured motorist coverage under motor vehicle liability insurance policies delivered or issued for delivery in this Commonwealth to a named insured in an amount equal 20250SB0578PN0586 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 to your bodily injury liability coverage limits. An insurer shall make available and a named insured may select amounts of uninsured and underinsured motorist coverage lower than the bodily injury liability limits elected. Insurers may make available amounts of uninsured and underinsured motorist coverage higher than the bodily injury liability limits elected.(8) Insurers may offer higher benefit levels than those enumerated above as well as additional benefits. However, an insured may elect to purchase lower benefit levels than those enumerated above.Your signature on this notice or your payment of any [renewal] policy premium evidences your actual knowledge and understanding of the availability of these benefits and limits as well as the benefits and limits you have selected.If you have any questions or you do not understand all of the various options available to you, contact your agent or company.If you do not understand any of the provisions contained in this notice, contact your agent or company before you sign.§ 1792. Availability of uninsured, underinsured, bodily injury liability and property damage coverages and [mandatory] deductibles.(a) Availability of coverages and deductibles.--(1) Except for policies issued under Subchapter D (relating to Assigned Risk Plan)[, an]:(i) An insurer delivering or issuing for delivery a policy of bodily injury liability coverage pursuant to 20250SB0578PN0586 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 this chapter shall make available for purchase [higher] limits of [uninsured, underinsured and] bodily injury liability coverages up to at least $100,000 because of injury to one person in any one accident and up to at least $300,000 because of injury to two or more persons in any one accident or, at the option of the insurer, up to at least $300,000 in a single limit for these coverages.(ii) An i nsurer delivering or issuing for delivery a policy of uninsured and underinsured coverage pursuant to this chapter shall make available for purchase limits of uninsured and underinsured motorist coverage to a named insured equal to the amount of the named insured's bodily injury liability coverage limits. An insurer shall make available and a named insured may select amounts of uninsured and underinsured motorist coverage lower than the bodily injury liability limits elected. An insurer may make available amounts of uninsured and underinsured motorist coverage higher than the bodily injury liability limits elected.(2) Additionally, an insurer shall make available for purchase at least $5,000 because of damage to property of others in any one accident. However, the exclusion of availability relating to the Assigned Risk Plan shall not apply to damage to property of others in any one accident.* * *Section 7. A change in coverage of a motor vehicle liability insurance policy delivered or issued for delivery or renewed in this Commonwealth resulting from the amendment or addition of 75 Pa.C.S. §§ 1731(a) and 1734.1 shall not impact the validity of 20250SB0578PN0586 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 any waiver, rejection, selection of benefits or amount of benefits in the policy beyond the coverage amounts as a result of the amendment or addition of 75 Pa.C.S. §§ 1731(a) and 1734.1 or require that new forms be signed by the named insured in the policy.Section 8. The amendment or addition of 75 Pa.C.S. §§ 1731(a), 1734.1, 1738.1, 1791 and 1792(a) shall apply to a motor vehicle liability insurance policy delivered or issued for delivery or renewed in this Commonwealth on or after one year from the effective date of this section. Nothing in the amendment or addition of 75 Pa.C.S. §§ 1731(a), 1734.1, 1738.1, 1791 and 1792(a) shall be construed to alter the election of tort options in a motor vehicle liability insurance policy delivered or issued for delivery or renewed in this Commonwealth on or after one year from the effective date of this section.Section 9. This act shall take effect in one year.20250SB0578PN0586 - 13 - 12345678910111213141516